Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-789
Signature verification; effect.

(1) The principal circulator or circulators shall file, as one instrument,
all petition papers comprising a recall petition for signature verification
with the filing clerk within thirty days after the filing clerk issues the
initial petition papers to the principal circulator or circulators as provided
in section 31-787.

(2) Within fifteen days after the filing of the petition, the filing
clerk shall ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by sufficient
qualified resident voters and qualified property owning voters as provided
in section
31-787. No new signatures may be added after the initial filing of the petition
papers. No signatures may be removed unless the filing clerk receives an affidavit
signed by the person requesting that his or her signature be removed before
the petitions are filed with the filing clerk for signature verification.

(3) If the petition is found to be sufficient, the filing clerk shall
attach to the petition a certificate showing the result of such examination.
If the petition is found not to be sufficient, the filing clerk shall file
the petition in his or her office without prejudice to the filing of a new
petition for the same purpose.

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 176, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1121, § 2.